Washington statutes.
RCW 19.190.080

Personally identifying information—Violation of chapter.

It is a violation of this chapter to solicit, request, or take any action to induce a person to provide personally identifying information by means of a web page, electronic mail message, or otherwise using the internet by representing oneself, either directly or by implication, to be another person, without the authority or approval of such other person.

[ 2005 c 378 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—2005 c 378: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 2005 c 378 s 6.]